Hawaii, session 2025, SB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 67, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, section 3, is amended by amending subsection (f) to read as follows: "(f) The task force shall submit an interim report on the status of its comprehensive strategic plan, including findings, recommendations, and any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each of the regular [session] sessions of 2024[.], 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, and 2029.  The task force shall submit a final report of its comprehensive strategic plan, including findings, recommendations, and any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of [2025.] 2030." SECTION 2.  Act 67, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, is amended by amending section 5 to read as follows: "SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2023, and shall be repealed on June 30, [2025] 2030." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of supporting the work of the illegal fireworks task force established pursuant to Act 67, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, including: (1)  Costs associated with the operation of the task force and hiring of necessary administrative support staff; and (2)  Reimbursement of moneys to law enforcement agencies for task-force-related law enforcement operations, including law enforcement personnel, overtime and other salary-related payments, charges for fuel, equipment, and storage and disposal of confiscated fireworks. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050; provided that section 2 shall take effect on June 29, 2025.